Colorado statutes. TITLE 41 Aeronautics: Aircraft and Airports
ARTICLE 6
AEROSPACE

Section

41-6-101. Limited liability for spaceflight activities - definitions - agreement and warning.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Spaceflight activity" means launch services or reentry services as those terms are defined in 51 U.S.C. sec. 50902.

"Spaceflight entity" means any public or private entity holding a United States federal aviation administration launch, reentry, operator, or launch site license for spaceflight activities. The term also includes any manufacturer or supplier of components, services, or vehicles, which manufacturer or supplier has been reviewed by the United States federal aviation administration as part of issuing such a license, permit, or authorization.

"Spaceflight participant" means any spaceflight participant as that term is defined in 51 U.S.C. sec. 50902.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), a spaceflight entity is not liable for injury to or death of a spaceflight participant resulting from the inherent risks of spaceflight activities so long as the agreement and warning contained in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section is distributed and signed as required. Except as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), a spaceflight participant or his or her representative may not maintain an action against or recover from a spaceflight entity for any loss, damage, injury, or death of the spaceflight participant resulting exclusively from any of the inherent risks of spaceflight activities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the contrary, this subsection (2) does not limit liability if the spaceflight entity does one or more of the following:

Commits an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the spaceflight participant and that act or omission proximately causes loss, damage, injury, or death to the spaceflight participant;

Has actual knowledge or reasonably should have known of a dangerous condition on the land or in the facilities or equipment used in the spaceflight activities and the danger proximately causes injury, damage, or death to the spaceflight participant; or

Intentionally injures the spaceflight participant.

Every spaceflight entity providing spaceflight activities to a spaceflight participant, whether such activities occur on or off the site of a facility capable of launching a suborbital flight, shall have each spaceflight participant sign the agreement and warning statement specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).

The agreement shall include the following language and any other language required by federal law:

Failure to comply with the warning statement requirements in this section prevents a spaceflight entity from invoking the privileges of immunity provided by this section.

AGREEMENT AND WARNING

Under Colorado law, there is no liability for any loss, damage, injury to, or death of a spaceflight participant in a spaceflight activity provided by a spaceflight entity if such loss, damage, injury, or death results from the inherent risks of the spaceflight activity to the spaceflight participant. Injuries caused by the inherent risks of spaceflight activities may include, among others, death or injury to person or property. I, the undersigned spaceflight participant, assume the inherent risk of participating in this spaceflight activity.
_______________
(signed)
_______________
(witnessed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article added, (SB 12-035), ch. 126, p. 431, § 2, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act adding this article, see section 1 of chapter 126, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.